Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
159

HAWAII
MEAT INSPECTION ACT

Part I. General Provisions

Section

159-1 Short title

159-2 Findings and declaration of necessity

159-3 Definitions

Part II. Administration, Powers and Duties

159-6 Administration

159-7 General powers

159-8 Information, investigation, hearings

Part III. Licensing

159-11 Certificate of sanitation

159-12 License required

159-13 Application for a license

159-14 License fees

159-15 Bonding

159-16 Granting, suspending and revoking licenses

159-17 Records of licensees

Part IV. Inspection Requirements

159-21 Ante-mortem inspection

159-22 Post-mortem inspection; reinspection

159-23 Labeling, marking, and branding

159-24 Sanitation

159-25 Slaughter, transportation, and selling

159-26 Forgery of mark, brand, or label

159-27 Inspector

159-28 Bribery

159-29 Exemptions

159-30 Storing, handling and transporting

Part IVA. Exotic Animals; Reimbursable
Inspection

159-31 Inspection of exotic animals

159-32 Reimbursement for inspection

159-33 Conduct of exotic animal inspection

159-34 Prohibitions

Part V. Meat Processors and Related
Industries

159-36 Articles not intended for human food

159-37 Records; subject to examination

159-38 Registration

159-39 Dead, dying, disabled, or diseased animals

Part VI. Inspection Service, Withdrawal and
Compensation

159-46 Inspection; overtime compensation

159-47 Repealed

159-48 Refusal and withdrawal of inspection

Part VII. Violations, Penalties,
Prosecution, Compacts,

Construction

159-51 Interstate and federal compacts

159-52 Penalties; prosecution

159-53 Construction

159-54 Enforcement

159-55 Citation and summons

159-56 Administration of oath

159-57 Failure to obey summons

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next